en: Intended effect: Anti-inflammatory; Calm and relaxation; Focus and clarity; Immune support; Joint support; Mood support; Pain relief; Sleep support; Stress and anxiety relief; Other
nl: Beoogd effect: Ontstekingsremmend; Rust en ontspanning; Focus en helderheid; Immuunondersteuning; Gewrichtsondersteuning; Stemmingsondersteuning; Pijnstilling; Slaapondersteunend; Stress- en angstverlichting; Andere
hr-HR: Namijenjeni učinak: Protuupalno; Smirenje i opuštanje; Fokus i jasnoća; Potpora imunitetu; Potpora zglobovima; Potpora raspoloženju; Ublažavanje bolova; Potpora spavanju; Ublažavanje stresa i anksioznosti; Ostalo
ko: 의도된 효과: 항염증; 진정 및 이완; 집중력 및 명료함; 면역 지원; 관절 지원; 기분 지원; 통증 완화; 수면 지원; 스트레스 및 불안 완화; 기타
sl-SI: Predvideni učinek: Protivnetno; Umirjanje in sprostitev; Osredotočenost in jasnost; Podpora imunskemu sistemu; Podpora sklepom; Podpora razpoloženju; Lajšanje bolečin; Podpora spanju; Lajšanje stresa in anksioznosti; Drugo
vi: Hiệu ứng dự định: Kháng viêm; Bình tĩnh và thư giãn; Tập trung và sáng suốt; Hỗ trợ miễn dịch; Hỗ trợ khớp; Hỗ trợ tâm trạng; Giảm đau; Hỗ trợ giấc ngủ; Giảm căng thẳng và lo âu; Khác
hu: Tervezett hatás: Gyulladáscsökkentő; Nyugalom és relaxáció; Fókusz és tisztaság; Immunerősítés; Ízületi támogatás; Hangulatjavítás; Fájdalomcsillapítás; Alváselősegítés; Stressz- és szorongásoldás; Egyéb
cs: Zamýšlený účinek: Protizánětlivé; Klid a relaxace; Soustředění a jasnost; Podpora imunity; Podpora kloubů; Podpora nálady; Úleva od bolesti; Podpora spánku; Úleva od stresu a úzkosti; Jiné
da: Tilsigtet effekt: Betændelseshæmmende; Ro og afslapning; Fokus og klarhed; Immunstøtte; Ledstøtte; Humørstøtte; Smertelindring; Søvnstøtte; Stress- og angstlindring; Andet
pt-PT: Efeito pretendido: Anti-inflamatório; Calma e relaxamento; Foco e clareza; Suporte imunitário; Suporte articular; Suporte de humor; Alívio da dor; Suporte do sono; Alívio do stress e ansiedade; Outro
sv: Avsedd effekt: Antiinflammatorisk; Lugn och avslappning; Fokus och klarhet; Immunstöd; Ledstöd; Humörstöd; Smärtlindring; Sömnstöd; Stress- och ångestlindring; Övrigt
de: Beabsichtigter Effekt: Entzündungshemmend; Ruhe und Entspannung; Fokus und Klarheit; Immununterstützung; Gelenkunterstützung; Stimmungsunterstützung; Schmerzlinderung; Schlafunterstützung; Stress- und Angstlinderung; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Numatomas poveikis: Priešuždegiminis; Ramybė ir atsipalaidavimas; Susikaupimas ir aiškumas; Imuninės sistemos palaikymas; Sąnarių palaikymas; Nuotaikos palaikymas; Skausmo malšinimas; Miego palaikymas; Streso ir nerimo mažinimas; Kita
es: Efecto previsto: Antiinflamatorio; Calma y relajación; Enfoque y claridad; Soporte inmunológico; Soporte articular; Soporte del estado de ánimo; Alivio del dolor; Soporte para el sueño; Alivio del estrés y la ansiedad; Otros
ro-RO: Efect scontat: Antiinflamator; Calmare și relaxare; Concentrare și claritate; Suport imunitar; Suport pentru articulații; Suport pentru dispoziție; Ameliorarea durerii; Suport pentru somn; Ameliorarea stresului și anxietății; Altele
pt-BR: Efeito pretendido: Anti-inflamatório; Calma e relaxamento; Foco e clareza; Suporte imunológico; Suporte articular; Suporte de humor; Alívio da dor; Suporte para o sono; Alívio do estresse e ansiedade; Outro
tr: Amaçlanan etki: İltihap önleyici; Sakinlik ve gevşeme; Odak ve netlik; Bağışıklık desteği; Eklem desteği; Ruh hali desteği; Ağrının azalması; Uyku desteği; Stres ve anksiyete giderici; Diğer
zh-CN: 预期效果: 抗炎; 镇静和放松; 专注和清晰; 免疫支持; 关节支持; 情绪支持; 缓解疼痛; 睡眠支持; 压力和焦虑缓解; 其他
ja: 意図された効果: 抗炎症; 鎮静とリラクゼーション; 集中力と明晰性; 免疫サポート; 関節サポート; 気分のサポート; 鎮痛; 睡眠サポート; ストレスと不安の緩和; その他
sk-SK: Zamýšľaný účinok: Protizápalový; Upokojenie a relaxácia; Sústredenie a jasnosť; Podpora imunity; Podpora kĺbov; Podpora nálady; Úľava od bolesti; Podpora spánku; Úľava od stresu a úzkosti; Iné
it: Effetto previsto: Antinfiammatorio; Calma e rilassamento; Concentrazione e chiarezza; Supporto immunitario; Supporto articolare; Supporto dell'umore; Antidolorifici; Supporto del sonno; Sollievo da stress e ansia; Altro
ru: Предполагаемый эффект: Противовоспалительный; Успокоение и расслабление; Фокус и ясность; Поддержка иммунитета; Поддержка суставов; Поддержка настроения; Облегчение боли; Поддержка сна; Снятие стресса и тревоги; Другой
el: Προβλεπόμενη επίδραση: Αντιφλεγμονώδες; Ηρεμία και χαλάρωση; Εστίαση και διαύγεια; Ανοσοποιητική υποστήριξη; Υποστήριξη αρθρώσεων; Υποστήριξη διάθεσης; Ανακούφιση από τον πόνο; Υποστήριξη ύπνου; Ανακούφιση από το στρες και το άγχος; Άλλο
fr: Effet recherché: Anti-inflammatoire; Calme et relaxation; Concentration et clarté; Soutien immunitaire; Soutien articulaire; Soutien de l'humeur; Anti-douleurs; Soutien au sommeil; Soulagement du stress et de l'anxiété; Autre
nb: Tiltenkt effekt: Betennelsesdempende; Ro og avslapning; Fokus og klarhet; Immunstøtte; Leddstøtte; Humørstøtte; Smertestillende; Søvnstøtte; Stress- og angstlindring; Annet
th: ผลที่ตั้งใจ: ต้านการอักเสบ; ผ่อนคลายและสงบ; สมาธิและความชัดเจน; เสริมภูมิคุ้มกัน; บำรุงข้อต่อ; เสริมอารมณ์; แก้ปวด; ช่วยการนอนหลับ; บรรเทาความเครียดและความวิตกกังวล; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 預期效果: 抗發炎; 鎮靜和放鬆; 專注和清晰; 免疫支持; 關節支持; 情緒支持; 緩解疼痛; 睡眠支持; 壓力和焦慮緩解; 其他
pl: Zamierzony efekt: Przeciwzapalny; Uspokojenie i relaksacja; Koncentracja i jasność umysłu; Wsparcie odporności; Wsparcie stawów; Wsparcie nastroju; Uśmierzenie bólu; Wsparcie snu; Łagodzenie stresu i lęku; Inne
bg-BG: Предназначен ефект: Противовъзпалителен; Спокойствие и релаксация; Фокус и яснота; Имунна поддръжка; Поддръжка на ставите; Поддръжка на настроението; Облекчаване на болката; Поддръжка на съня; Облекчаване на стрес и тревожност; Други
fi: Aiottu vaikutus: Tulehdusta ehkäisevä; Rauhoittava ja rentouttava; Keskittyminen ja selkeys; Vastustuskyvyn tuki; Nivelten tuki; Mielialan tuki; Kivunlievitys; Unen tuki; Stressin ja ahdistuksen lievitys; Muu